District of Columbia statutes.
8-115.02

Repealed

Establishment of lead-based paint abatement and control program

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-221, § 3, 43 DCR 6854
Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-347, § 2(b), 52 DCR 2627
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 21(a), 56 DCR 1596
1981 Ed., § 6-997.2.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101 of the Omnibus Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-124, July 27, 1995, 42 DCR 4160).
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 11-221 the “Lead-Based Paint Abatement and Control Act of 1996”, see Mayor’s Order 97-118, June 25, 1997 ( 44 DCR 4137).